Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 135. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 135.01. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM; ROLE AND MISSION. (a) Texas State Technical College System is a coeducational two-year institution of higher education offering courses of study in technical-vocational education for which there is demand within the State of Texas.

(b) Texas State Technical College System shall contribute to the educational and economic development of the State of Texas by offering occupationally oriented programs with supporting academic course work, emphasizing highly specialized advanced and emerging technical and vocational areas for certificates or associate degrees. The Texas State Technical College System is authorized to serve the State of Texas through excellence in instruction, public service, faculty and manpower research, and economic development. The system's economic development efforts to improve the competitiveness of Texas business and industry include exemplary centers of excellence in technical program clusters on the system's campuses and support of educational research commercialization initiatives. Through close collaboration with business, industry, governmental agencies, and communities, including public and private secondary and postsecondary educational institutions, the system shall facilitate and deliver an articulated and responsive technical education system.

(c) In developing and offering highly specialized technical programs with related supportive coursework, primary consideration shall be placed on industrial and technological manpower needs of the state. The emphasis of each Texas State Technical College System campus shall be on advanced or emerging technical programs not commonly offered by public junior colleges.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3316, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 2.02, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.011. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the Texas State Technical College System.

(2) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(3) "System" means the Texas State Technical College System.

(4) "Faculty research" means research using the system's facilities and equipment that is:

(A) consistent with the system's mission; and

(B) funded by private sources, competitively acquired sources, or appropriated public funding.

(5) "Campus" means a unit of the system that grants associate degrees and certificates.

(6) "Extension center" means a site, operating under the administration of a campus, that has an extension program.

(7) "Extension program" includes credit and noncredit instruction in technical-vocational education.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 629 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1219 (S.B. 489), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 135.02. LOCATION. (a) The Texas State Technical College System is composed of:

(1) a system office located in the city of Waco in McLennan County;

(2) a campus located in Cameron County;

(3) a campus serving West Texas that operates as a collective unit of strategically positioned permanent locations in Nolan County, Taylor County, Brown County, and Stephens County;

(4) a campus located in Harrison County;

(5) a campus located in McLennan County;

(6) a campus located in Fort Bend County;

(7) a campus that operates as a collective unit of one or more locations in Ellis County;

(8) a campus that operates as a collective unit of one or more locations in Comal County and Guadalupe County;

(9) a campus located in Denton County;

(10) a campus that operates as a collective unit of one or more locations in Williamson County east of State Highway 130 and Interstate Highway 35; and

(11) campuses assigned to the system from time to time by specific legislative Act.

(b) The system may operate an extension center created after September 1, 1991, in a city or county if:

(1) the coordinating board has given prior approval to the extension center, after considering the role and mission of the system, the needs of this state and of the community involved, the actions of the legislature, if any, and the efficient and effective use of the state's educational resources for the economic development of this state;

(2) a political subdivision of this state provides and maintains appropriate equipment and facilities for the delivery of technical-vocational education, including maintenance and utilities; and

(3) funding for the extension center is approved by specific legislative Act.

(c) The board may accept or acquire by purchase in the name of the State of Texas land and facilities in any of the counties in which a campus or extension center is located. The coordinating board must review and approve the acceptance or acquisition of any land and facilities if:

(1) the board of regents requests to place the land and facilities on its educational and general buildings and facilities inventory; and

(2) the combined value of the land and facilities is more than $300,000 at the time the board of regents requests the property to be added to the educational and general buildings and facilities inventory.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3316, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3341, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 464, Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1 to 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 359, Sec. 3; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 238, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 394 (S.B. 514), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1219 (S.B. 489), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1096 (H.B. 3640), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 49 (H.B. 1051), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (H.B. 658), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 528 (H.B. 3287), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (H.B. 4997), Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2023.

Sec. 135.04. APPROVAL OF PROGRAMS. (a) Educational programs wholly or partially financed from state funds are subject to the prior approval or disapproval and continuing review of the coordinating board.

(b) Before any program may be offered by a campus or extension center within the tax district of a public junior college that is operating a vocational and technical program, it must be established that the public junior college is not capable of offering or is unable to offer the program. After it is established that a need for the program exists and that the program is not locally available, the campus or extension center may offer the program, provided approval is secured from the coordinating board. Approval of technical-vocational programs under this section does not apply to Brown, McLennan, Cameron, Fort Bend, Comal, Denton, Guadalupe, Williamson, and Potter Counties.

(c) Where a local government, business, or industry located in a county or a portion of a county that is not operating a public junior college district requests that the campus or extension center offer a program, the campus or extension center may offer the program provided approval is secured from the coordinating board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3316, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 8, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1076 (H.B. 3332), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (H.B. 658), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 528 (H.B. 3287), Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 135.05. SERVICES FOR THE DEAF. (a) The system shall provide qualified interpreters for deaf students in attendance at each campus. In order to be qualified, an interpreter must:

(1) be capable of giving verbatim transliteration or interpretation of the spoken word through finger spelling, the language of signs, or speaking without voice;

(2) be capable of sign-to-voice interpretation from the language of signs to the spoken word; and

Text of (3) as amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 5

(3) hold a certificate from the National Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf or an equivalent certificate issued by the Texas Commission for the Deaf.

Text of (3) as amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 345, Sec. 3

(3) hold a Level III, IV, or V certificate issued by the Texas Commission for the Deaf or other certificate approved by the executive officer of the institute.

(b) The system shall also provide equipment, materials, and services, including tutoring, counseling, and other support services, necessary for the deaf student to take full advantage of existing educational programs.

(c) The executive officer shall determine which courses offered by the institute are appropriate for an electronic display on a screen or terminal, with less than 30 seconds delay, of a speaker's spoken message. The institute shall implement the electronic display in those courses.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1034, ch. 379, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 345, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.06. EXTENSION PROGRAM. (a) Texas State Technical College System is authorized to provide extension programs of training in the fields of Technical-Vocational Education as temporary programs to address current unemployment problems.

(b) The system may accept in the name of the State of Texas any real or personal properties. The system shall not be authorized by this section to establish permanent programs or campuses.

(c) The system may operate an extension program by the use of gifts and grants from any public or private source and other legislative appropriations.

(d) The system may enter into contracts with existing political subdivisions, state agencies, state institutions, private entities, or federal agencies to carry out an extension program.

(e) The extension program shall be limited to the needs for Technical-Vocational Training in the area being served and shall be subject to the provisions of Subsections (e) and (j) of Section 61.051 of this code.

(f) The system may not use legislative appropriations for physical plant operations or utility costs of an extension program or center created after September 1, 1991.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4527, ch. 742, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.07. FUNDING; GIFTS AND GRANTS. (a) The legislature shall appropriate funds for administration, instruction, and physical plant operations and utilities for each campus of the system and for each extension program created before September 1, 1991, on the basis of formulas developed by the coordinating board.

(b) The legislature shall appropriate funds for administration of and instruction at each extension program created after September 1, 1991, and operated by the system on the basis of formulas developed by the coordinating board.

(c) The system may accept gifts and grants from any public or private source.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.03, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 882, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.08. AIRPORT. (a) The Waco campus may operate its airport as a public airport.

(b) The system may not use legislative appropriations for the airport but may use federal or public agency grants for aviation or economic development.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF REGENTS; ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 135.21. BOARD OF REGENTS. The organization and control of the system is vested in a board of nine regents.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.22. APPOINTMENT OF BOARD. The governor shall appoint members of the board with the advice and consent of the senate. In appointing members of the board the governor shall include persons representing agriculture, business, industry, and labor. Each member of the board shall be a citizen of Texas and shall take the constitutional oath of office.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 135.23. TERMS OF OFFICE. The term of office of each regent is six years. Any vacancy that occurs on the board is filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the governor.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.24. ORGANIZATION; BYLAWS. The board shall elect one of the members chairman; elect other officers as it deems necessary; and enact bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for the successful management and operation of the system.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.25. MEETINGS. The board shall meet as prescribed by its bylaws.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.26. COMPENSATION. Members of the board may not receive salary or compensation for their services, but they shall receive reimbursement for their actual expenses incurred in attending to the work of the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3317, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.27. SYSTEM CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICE; EXECUTIVE OFFICER. (a) The central administration office of the system shall provide oversight and coordination of the activities of each component of the system.

(b) The board shall appoint an executive officer of the system and determine the executive officer's term of office, salary, and duties.

(c) The executive officer shall recommend a plan for the organization of the system and the appointment of an executive officer for each campus of the system.

(d) The executive officer of the system is responsible to the board for the general management and success of the system, and the board shall cooperate with the executive officer to carry out that responsibility.

(e) In addition to other powers and duties provided by this code or other law, the central administration office of the system shall recommend necessary policies and rules to the governing board of the system to ensure conformity with all laws and rules and to provide uniformity in data collection and financial reporting procedures.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 464, Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER C. BOARD OF REGENTS; POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 135.51. CERTIFICATES, DIPLOMAS, AND ASSOCIATE DEGREES. (a) The board shall prescribe and award associate of applied science degrees, certificates, and diplomas limited to those appropriate to technical education.

(b) The board may offer and award an associate of science degree in a field of study at Texas State Technical College--Harlingen campus if the coordinating board determines that the degree in that field of study:

(1) is appropriate to the role and mission of the system; and

(2) meets the educational or workforce needs of the region in which the campus is located.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 10, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 629 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 135.52. FEES AND TUITION. (a) The board shall collect tuition at the rates provided by law and registration fees.

(b) The board may charge a student a higher rate of tuition than the tuition that would otherwise be charged for a course in which the student enrolls if:

(1) the student has previously enrolled in the same course or a course of substantially the same content and level two or more times; and

(2) the student's enrollment in the course is not included in the contact hours used in the funding formulas established under Section 61.059 for use in making appropriation recommendations for the system.

(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to a non-degree-credit developmental course.

(d) The total amount of tuition charged to the student under Subsection (b) for the repeated course may not exceed the full cost of instruction for the course with respect to the student.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 26, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1220 (H.B. 994), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 135.53. NONRESIDENT FEE EXEMPTIONS. The board may enter into cooperative agreements which exempt technical students from nonresident fees when there are reciprocal privileges granted to Texas residents.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 135.54. CONTRACTS. The board may contract with individuals, federal, state, and local agencies and departments, corporations, and associations to provide:

(1) educational programs designed to meet the need for trained personnel in Texas; or

(2) programs for economic development that benefit this state.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.55. SUITS; VENUE. The board may sue, and may be sued, in the name of the Texas State Technical College System, with venue being in either McLennan County or Travis County.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.56. BONDS AND NOTES; PLEDGE OF REVENUE. (a) The board may irrevocably pledge the fees, charges, revenues, and the proceeds of the lease, sale, transfer, or exchange of or from the buildings, land, structures, and the additions to the existing buildings and structures authorized to be constructed, improved, or equipped and to pledge the revenue of the proceeds of the lease, sale, transfer, or exchange of or from any other revenue-producing buildings, structures, facilities, and other property to the payment of the interest on and the principal of bonds authorized to be issued by Chapter 55 of this code, and to enter into agreements regarding the imposition of fees, charges, and other revenue and the collection, pledge, and disposition as the board deems appropriate. However, where land and improvements on the land, the revenue of which has been pledged to pay bonds, are to be sold, the sale is conditioned on the deposit by the board of the proceeds of the sale to the sinking fund created by the bond order of the issuing authority.

(b) All income received by the board under the provisions of this section shall be accounted for and used in the same manner as other money available to the board for the establishment or operation of the system.

(c) The bonds authorized to be issued under Chapter 55 of this code are special obligations of the board issuing the bonds and are payable only from a pledge of the fees, charges, and other revenues authorized by this section and from the proceeds of the lease, sale, transfer, or exchange of land and improvements on the land the revenue of which is pledged to secure the payment of interest on and principal of the bonds.

(d) The board, in addition to the authority already provided, may issue revenue bonds for the purposes authorized and in the manner prescribed and under the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 55 of this code.

(e) The board may issue additional revenue bonds for the purposes authorized and in the manner prescribed by 26 U.S.C. Section 142, relating to airport development, water and sewage treatment, residential construction, and other matters within the role and scope of the system.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3318, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.561. USE OF PROPERTY. The board may lease, sell, transfer, or exchange land and permanent improvements owned by the system as the board determines is in the best interest of fulfilling the mission of the system.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.57. INSURANCE. The board may procure the property and liability insurance coverages required by the United States to protect it and its agencies against the possibility of loss or liability in connection with property owned by the United States and loaned to the system pursuant to the provisions of the National Industrial Reserve Act of 1948, 50 U.S.C. Secs. 451-462.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3319, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.58. WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE. The board may provide workers' compensation insurance for its employees according to the provisions of Chapter 229, Acts of the 50th Legislature, 1947, as amended (Article 8309b, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes).

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3319, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.59. CONTRACTS WITH INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. The board may enter into any contracts and agreements with an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003 of this code, or a private or independent college or university that is accredited by a recognized accrediting agency under Section 61.003 of this code, for joint participation in programs that may be designed to benefit the State of Texas.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3319, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.60. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The board may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire land, clearance easements for airport zoning, and facilities in any of the counties in which a campus is located or in a county adjacent to one of those counties.

(b) The board must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, but the board is not required to provide a bond for appeal or a bond for costs.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 135.61. FORECASTING TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAM NEEDS. (a) The board shall develop and administer a program to forecast the types of technical education programs that are needed to maintain and improve the state's economic and technological competitiveness.

(b) The program shall review the state's business and industry workforce needs for trained and educated workers and suggest specific technical education programs in specific areas that are needed to ensure or that would enhance the state's economic and technological competitiveness. The board may recommend the creation of new technical education programs or new methods of delivering technical education programs.

(c) The board shall provide information and recommendations developed under the program to any institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, that:

(1) provides technical education programs; or

(2) the board determines should offer technical education programs for the purpose of Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1563, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER D. PARTNERSHIPS BETWEEN TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM AND PUBLIC JUNIOR COLLEGES

Sec. 135.101. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "public junior college" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 135.102. PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTS. (a) With the approval of the coordinating board, the board and a public junior college may enter into a partnership agreement designed to coordinate the management and operations of the institutions and to enhance the delivery of technical education programs across this state. The agreement does not abrogate the powers and duties of the boards with regard to the governance of their respective institutions.

(b) A partnership agreement under this subchapter must:

(1) provide that the participating institutions, in conjunction with the local community, identify and offer courses that will meet the educational and workforce development goals for the region;

(2) provide that program offerings receive approval from the coordinating board;

(3) provide for the distribution of responsibilities regarding specific program offerings and resulting awards;

(4) provide for the distribution of tuition, fees, and state funds associated with formula funding regarding program offerings; and

(5) comply with applicable rules of the coordinating board relating to contractual agreements.

(c) A partnership agreement between the system and a public junior college under this subchapter is considered to be in compliance with Sections 135.04(b) and (c).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 135.103. JOINT USE OF PERSONNEL. The governing boards of the participating institutions may fill by joint appointment any administrative, faculty, or support position necessary for the operation of the institutions.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 135.104. SUPPORT SERVICES. The governing boards of the participating institutions may assign the management and operation of selected services, including maintenance of buildings and grounds, operation of auxiliary enterprises, and operation of a jointly supported library, to one of the institutions in order to achieve cost-effectiveness.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 135.105. FACILITIES. (a) The participating institutions may, under the terms of the partnership agreement, make provisions for adequate physical facilities for use by the institutions.

(b) The participating institutions may individually or collectively lease, purchase, finance, construct, or rehabilitate physical facilities under this section appropriate to partnership needs. The owning or financing of facilities under this section promotes the public purpose of supporting higher education and further promotes the public purpose of developing and diversifying the economy of this state and eliminating unemployment and underemployment in this state under the authority granted by Section 52-a, Article III, Texas Constitution.

(c) A participating institution of higher education may lease facilities from or to another participating institution for administrative and instructional purposes.

(d) Participating institutions may solicit, accept, and administer, on terms and conditions acceptable to the participating institutions, gifts, grants, or donations of any kind and from any source for facilities and equipment.

(e) A facility used for the purposes of a partnership agreement under this subchapter is not considered a facility used to operate an extension program under Section 135.06.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 135.106. STATE FUNDING. The system is entitled to receive state appropriations on the same formula basis as if the system did not enter into a partnership agreement under this subchapter, and any other participating institution of higher education is entitled to state appropriations on the same formula basis as other similar institutions of higher education.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 2760), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.